src-fst-morphology-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
# Meänkieli pronouns

This file documents [the file for Meänkieli pronouns](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc).

* LEXICON Pronoun 

## Persoonapronominit

* mie+Pron+Pers+Sg:m 12pronsg ; 
* ...

## Demonstratiivipronominit

* se+Pron+Dem+Sg: se_pron ; 

* tämä+Pron+Dem:tä tama ; 
* tuo+Pron+Dem:tuo tuo ; 
* nämä+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:nämät K ; 
* nämä+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:nämä K ; 
* nämä+Pron+Dem+Pl:näi namaobl ; 

* mikä+Pron+Rel+Sg:mi relkys ; 
* joka+Pron+Rel+Sg:jo relkys ; 
* mikä+Pron+Interr+Sg:mi relkys ; 
* joka+Pron+Interr+Sg:jo relkys ; 

* mikä+Pron+Rel+Pl:mi mi_rel_pl ;  
... etc.

## Sanakirjasta

* usea+Pron:usea pron_x3 ; 
* harva+Pron:pron pron_x1 ; 

* kullaki pronx ; 
* kumpiki pronx ; 
* kuki pronx ; 
* ken pronx ; 
* meikäläinen+Pron+Indef:meikäläi toisen ; 
* sellainen+Pron+Indef:sellai toisen ; 
* mikhään pronx ; 
* kumpiko pronx ; 
* molemat pronx ; 
* molemin pronx ; 
* nuot pronx ; 
* muu:mu MUU ; 
* mä pronx ; 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
